Tennessee, session 114, SB2412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2027, the administrative office of the courts shall
submit a report on whether the limit on the compensation for noneconomic damages and
catastrophic loss or injury should be raised and, if so, their recommendations. The report must
be submitted to the chair of the judiciary committee of the senate and the chair of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over civil-related matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2412
012731
- 1 -